Idaho, session 2025, H0110.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 94, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-9417, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-9417. PRACTICE AUTHORITY PROTECTION. If a health care service is
covered by state law in the medicaid program, the state department of health
and welfare shall not prohibit any state licensed or registered health care
provider from providing the service within the provider's state-authorized
practice from the licensing authority unless:
(1) State law or regulation expressly excludes a certain health care
provider type from providing the service to medicaid beneficiaries; or
(2) The provider fails to enter into a written provider agreement with
the medicaid program.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.